Maryland, session 2026, HB0076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–1508.
(e) (2) Beginning with the 2019–2020 school year, and each school year
thereafter, before the school year begins, each local school system shall, in accordance with
the plan developed under subsection (d)(2) of this section, file a report identifying:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0076*

HOUSE BILL 76
(i) The public schools in the local school system’s jurisdiction that
have a school resource officer assigned to the school; and
(ii) If a public school in the local school system’s jurisdiction is not
assigned a school resource officer, the adequate local law enforcement coverage that will be
provided to the public school.
(g) (1) For fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor shall
include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $10,000,000 for the purpose of
providing grants to local school systems and local law enforcement agencies to assist in
meeting the requirements of subsection (e) of this section.
(2) Grants provided under this subsection [shall]:
(I) SHALL be made to each local school system based on the number
of schools in each school system in proportion to the total number of public schools in the
State in the prior year; AND
(II) MAY BE REALLOCATED TO LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEMS THAT
HAVE FULLY EXPENDED THEIR ALLOCATION AND DEMONSTRATE NEED WITHIN THE
SAME FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.